Hawaii statutes.
§121-18 Retired list. Officers shall
be placed on the retired list in the grade held at the time of retirement and
may if promoted by the commander in chief be placed on such list in the next
higher grade. Retired officers shall only be placed on active duty by order of
the commander in chief and while on active duty shall rank next to officers of
like grade upon the active list. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS §121-18]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next